Nevada, session 83, IP1.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 288 of NRS (Relations between
Governments and Public Employees) is hereby amended to read as
follows:
NRS 288.720 Prohibitions on strikes do not apply to certain
local government employees, employee organizations, bargaining
agents, and bargaining units.
1. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the provisions of
NRS 288.700 through NRS 288.715 and any other law prohibiting
strikes shall not apply to local government employees licensed as
teachers pursuant to Chapter 391 of the Nevada Revised Statutes
and their employee organizations, bargaining agents, and
bargaining units.
2. As used in this section: “teacher” means a person licensed
pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS who is classified by the board of
trustees of a school district:
(a) As a teacher and who spends at least 50 percent of his or
her work year providing instruction or discipline to pupils;
(b) As instructional support staff, who does not hold a
supervisory position and who spends not more than 50 percent of
his or her work year providing instruction to pupils. Such
-
*IP1*

– 2 –
instructional support staff includes, without limitation, librarians
and persons who provide instructional support; or
(c) As school counselors, school nurses and other employees
who spend at least 50 percent of their work year providing
emotional support, noninstructional guidance or medical support
to pupils.
Section 2. Severability. If any provision of this act, or the
application therefore to any person, thing or circumstance is held
invalid or unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, such
invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect the validity or
constitutionality of this act as a whole or any provision or
application of this act which can be given effect without the invalid
or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the
provisions of this act are declared to be severable.
Section 4. This act shall become effective if approved by the
legislature, or upon passage and approval by the voters.
H
-
*IP1*